Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB89.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 311B.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Accredited educational program" means a program that is approved by a national
organization acceptable to the board to provide education in medical imaging or
radiation therapy;
(2) "Actively employed" means an individual who is appropriately credentialed and
currently employed as an advanced imaging professional, medical imaging
technologist, radiation therapist, an educator or administrator in any of these
disciplines, or a limited X-ray machine operator;
(3) "Advanced imaging professional" means an individual who is credentialed by a
national[nationally recognized certification] organization that is recognized by the
board;
(4) "Authorized user" means a physician, dentist, or podiatrist identified on a
radioactive materials license that authorizes the medical use of radioactive materials
if the license was issued by:
(a) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(b) The United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission; or
(c) Another United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission agreement state;
(5) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy;
(6) ["Credentialed" means someone who is certified and registered by an appropriate
national organization that is recognized by the board;
(7) ]"Continuing education" means a learning activity that is planned, organized, and
administered to enhance the professional knowledge and skills of a licensed
individual of medical imaging or radiation therapy to provide services for patients,
the public, or the medical profession;
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
(7) "Credentialed" means someone who is certified and registered by an appropriate
national organization that is recognized by the board;
(8) "Diagnostic medical sonographer" means an individual who is authorized to
utilize nonionizing, high-frequency sound waves with specialized equipment to
generate images for diagnostic purposes;
(9) "Ionizing radiation":
(a) Means alpha particles, beta particles, gamma rays, X-rays, neutrons, high-
speed electrons, high-speed protons, or other particles capable of producing
ions; and
(b) Does not include nonionizing radiation;
(10) "Licensed practitioner" or "licensed practitioner of the healing arts" means a person
licensed in Kentucky to practice medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, chiropractic,
podiatry, or veterinary medicine;
(11)[(9)] "Limited X-ray machine operator" means an individual who performs limited
radiographic procedures that shall not include contrast studies, fluoroscopy,
magnetic resonance imaging, diagnostic medical sonography, nuclear medicine,
or radiation therapy procedures;
(12) "Magnetic resonance imaging technologist" means an individual who is
authorized to perform medical imaging that utilizes radiofrequency transmission
within a high-strength magnetic field for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes;
(13)[(10)] "Medical imaging technologist":
(a) 1. Means an individual who has completed an accredited educational
program in radiography, nuclear medicine, or other imaging modality
recognized by the board and who is licensed and granted privileges
under this chapter[. An individual licensed as a medical imaging
technologist or a limited X-ray machine operator shall be employed to
perform medical imaging at a facility where contrast studies,
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
fluoroscopy, nuclear medicine, or radiation therapy procedures are
performed, but a limited X-ray machine operator may only perform
limited diagnostic radiography]; and
2. Does not include a limited X-ray machine operator; and
(b) Shall only administer contrast media and other medications when a licensed
practitioner of the healing arts or an advanced practice registered nurse is
immediately available in person to ensure proper diagnosis and treatment of
adverse events;
(14)[(11)] "National organization" means:
(a) The American Society of Radiologic Technologists;
(b) The Nuclear Medicine Technology Certification Board;
(c) The American Registry of Radiologic Technologists;
(d) The Society of Nuclear Medicine and Molecular Imaging[Technologist
Section];
(e) The Joint Review Committee on Education in Radiologic Technology;
(f) The Joint Review Committee on Educational Programs in Nuclear Medicine
Technology;
(g) The American College of Radiology;[ or]
(h) American Registry for Diagnostic Medical Sonography;
(i) The Joint Review Committee on Education in Diagnostic Medical
Sonography;
(j) Society of Diagnostic Medical Sonography;
(k) American Institute of Ultrasound in Medicine;
(l) Cardiovascular Credentialing International;
(m) American Registry of Magnetic Resonance Imaging Technologists; or
(n) Another national organization recognized by the board;
(15) "Nonionizing radiation" includes radiation such as radiofrequency or
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
microwaves, visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light or ultrasound;
(16)[(12)] "Nuclear medicine technologist" means an individual who is authorized to
prepare and administer radiopharmaceuticals, pharmaceuticals, and radionuclides
under the direction of an authorized user to perform nuclear medicine procedures
for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes;
(17)[(13)] "Post-primary certification" means an individual who has primary
certification and has been awarded post-primary certification by a national
organization that has been recognized by the board;
(18)[(14)] "Primary certification" means an individual who has successfully completed a
formal educational program and certification in radiography, nuclear medicine,
radiation therapy, or other modality recognized by the board;
(19)[(15)] "Radiation therapist" means an individual who:
(a) Has completed an accredited educational program in radiation therapy;
(b) Is licensed by the board;[ and]
(c) Is authorized to utilize ionizing radiation-generating equipment and sources of
radiation for the planning, localization, and delivery of therapeutic procedures
on human beings; and
(d) Shall only administer contrast media and other medications when a licensed
practitioner of the healing arts or an advanced practice registered nurse is
immediately available in person to ensure proper diagnosis and treatment of
adverse events; and
(20)[(16)] "Radiographer" means an individual who is authorized to use ionizing
radiation-generating equipment to perform a comprehensive scope of diagnostic
imaging procedures and is responsible for the operation of radiation-generating
equipment, protecting the patient and staff from unnecessary radiation, and
selecting the appropriate exposure to produce diagnostic images with the lowest
reasonable exposure.
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
Section 2. KRS 311B.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of[for] Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy is hereby
created to promote, preserve, and protect the public health, safety, and welfare of
the citizens of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by regulating and licensing
individuals who use ionizing or nonionizing radiation as advanced imaging
professionals, medical imaging technologists, radiographers, radiation therapists,
nuclear medicine technologists, magnetic resonance imaging technologists,
diagnostic medical sonographers, limited X-ray machine operators, or any
combination of professions licensed under this chapter. The board shall consist of
eleven (11)[nine (9)] members appointed by the Governor, with the following
qualifications:
(a) Two (2) members shall be licensed radiographers whose primary work
responsibilities are related to general diagnostic radiography;
(b) Two (2) members shall be licensed radiographers with a post-primary
certification and whose primary work responsibilities are related to that post-
primary certification;
(c) One (1) member shall be a licensed nuclear medicine technologist;
(d) One (1) member shall be a licensed radiation therapist;
(e) One (1) member shall be a licensed limited X-ray machine operator;
(f) One (1) member shall be a licensed medical imaging technologist or therapist
who serves as an educator in an accredited program or as an administrator in a
medical imaging or radiation therapy department;[ and]
(g) One (1) member shall be a licensed diagnostic medical sonographer whose
primary work responsibilities are related to diagnostic medical sonography;
(h) One (1) member shall be a licensed magnetic resonance imaging
technologist; and
(i) One (1) member shall be an at-large individual[ at-large] from the general
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
public with no family or business relation to health care but with an interest in
the rights of consumers of health services.
(2) All board members, except the at-large member, shall have at least five (5) years of
experience in their respective areas of certification or licensure and shall maintain
active registry or certification and Kentucky licensure in medical imaging or
radiation therapy during the term as a board member. Each board member shall be a
resident of Kentucky or actively employed in medical imaging or radiation therapy
in Kentucky, and shall be in good standing with the board.
(3) (a) By May 1 of years in which terms expire, nominations of individuals for
appointment to the board shall be submitted to the Governor and may be made
by citizens of the Commonwealth of Kentucky through the Kentucky Society
of Radiologic Technologists, the Kentucky Society of Nuclear Medicine
Technologists, the board, or other professional imaging or radiation therapy
organizations that are recognized by the board.
(b) No two (2) board members shall be residents of the same county.
(c) A minimum of two (2) names per appointment shall be submitted to the
Governor.
(4) The Governor shall make each appointment by September 1 for terms beginning
November 1 of that same year. The initial terms of appointment shall be staggered
with five (5) members appointed for four (4) years and four (4) members appointed
for two (2) years. Thereafter, members shall be appointed to the board for terms of
four (4) years, expiring on October 31 of the fourth year. A board member may
serve two (2) consecutive appointments. After a second consecutive appointment,
that individual may not be reappointed until at least one (1) full year has passed.
Section 3. KRS 311B.050 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Administer and enforce this chapter. The board alone shall have this authority;
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
(2) Have the authority to recognize and enforce the current rules and administrative
regulations, practice standards, scopes of practice, and ethical standards of the
recognized national organizations and certifying bodies for technologists and
therapists regulated under this chapter;
(3) Have the authority to issue advisory opinions or declaratory rulings dealing with
the practice of medical imaging and radiation therapy;
(4) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
administer and enforce this chapter;
(5)[(3)] Issue and renew the licenses of duly qualified applicants, following
procedures established by the board through the promulgation of administrative
regulations;
(6)[(4)] Determine and enforce continuing education requirements and establish
guidelines for approval of continuing education;
(7)[(5)] Approve accredited educational programs of imaging or radiation therapy and
monitor compliance with the educational standards established by the individual
disciplines, as recognized by the board;
(8)[(6)] Designate funds for scholarships, program development, or continued
education;
(9)[(7)] Investigate suspected or alleged violations of this chapter, conduct hearings
and record minutes, resolve the allegations, and, if appropriate, impose sanctions or
penalties; and
(10)[(8)] Submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research
Commission that provides information concerning the board's work regarding
licensure of professionals under this chapter and that lists all hearings conducted by
the board and the decisions rendered.
Section 4. KRS 311B.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not engage or attempt to engage in the operation of radiation-
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
producing equipment or the administration of ionizing or nonionizing radiation for
the purpose of medical imaging or radiation therapy in Kentucky unless licensed in
accordance with[ the provisions of] this chapter.
(2) This chapter shall not apply to any individual licensed in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky as a licensed practitioner of the healing arts, any student enrolled in an
approved educational program in medical imaging technology or radiation therapy
while completing the clinical requirements of the educational program, or any
employee of the federal government engaged in the performance of official duties
within the state.
(3) Misuse of regulated credentials shall result in disciplinary action by the board in
addition to possible action by the credentialing agency.
(4) [Nothing in ]This chapter and[or in] the administrative regulations promulgated by
the board pursuant to this chapter shall not be interpreted to:
(a) Limit or restrict a licensed health care practitioner,[ or] provider, or
professional from engaging in the full scope of practice authorized by the
license for that person's profession, training, or services; or
(b) Prohibit any person from utilizing:
1. Ultrasounds for therapeutic purposes; or
2. Nonmedical ultrasounds for entertainment purposes, or keepsake
ultrasounds that are generated without a medical indication to view or
record images of a fetus.
Section 5. KRS 311B.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following individuals are required to apply for and receive a license from the
Commonwealth of Kentucky before performance of any procedures utilizing
ionizing or nonionizing radiation for either medical imaging or radiation therapy:
(a) Advanced imaging professionals;
(b) Medical imaging technologists;
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
(c) Radiographers;
(d) Radiation therapists;
(e) Nuclear medicine technologists;[ and]
(f) Magnetic resonance imaging technologists, except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section;
(g) Diagnostic medical sonographers, except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section; and
(h) Limited X-ray machine operators.
(2) Qualifications for the above categories shall be established by the board through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
The board may also identify other specialties or categories of duties consistent with
this chapter through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) An applicant for licensure under subsection (1)(a) to (g)[(e)] of this section who did
not graduate from an accredited educational program, is licensed or certified in
another jurisdiction with requirements and privileges comparable to Kentucky's,
and has:
(a) Graduated from a postsecondary institution in a course of study focusing on
one (1) of the licensing categories listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Passed a certifying examination from a national organization demonstrating
competence in his or her subject matter area;
(c) An active valid license or certificate and has not been professionally
disciplined or reprimanded by any credentialing jurisdiction or national
organization; and
(d) Provided the board with evidence of:
1. At least five (5) years of experience as an advanced imaging
professional; and
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
2. Maintenance of continuing education requirements during his or her
period of licensure or certification;
shall, upon application and payment of an application fee to the board, be granted
licensure by the board in his or her category, unless the board can show cause for
denial under KRS 311B.150[(4)].
(4) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to permit a magnetic resonance imaging technologist or a diagnostic
medical sonographer who is not credentialed by a national organization
recognized by the board to apply and obtain a license before January 1, 2028.
Additional credentialing shall not be required for those who obtain a license
before January 1, 2028.
(5) On or after January 1, 2028, all magnetic resonance imaging technologists and
diagnostic medical sonographers shall be:
(a) Credentialed by a national organization recognized by the board to qualify
for initial licensure or licensure reinstatement; and
(b) Licensed before performing any procedures utilizing ionizing or
nonionizing radiation for either medical imaging or radiation therapy as
required under subsection (1) of this section.
Section 6. KRS 311B.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for licensure as an advanced imaging professional, medical imaging
technologist, radiographer, radiation therapist, nuclear medicine technologist,
magnetic resonance imaging technologist, diagnostic medical sonographer, or
limited X-ray machine operator shall file an application in a format prescribed by
the board.
(2) The board shall require a national and state criminal background check for each
applicant seeking to be licensed by the board under this chapter. The criminal
background check shall be by means of a fingerprint check by the Department of
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
Kentucky State Police, or an equivalent state police body in the applicant's home
state, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, pursuant to the following:
(a) The applicant shall provide his or her complete and legible fingerprints to
the Department of Kentucky State Police, or an equivalent state police body
in the applicant's home state, for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation after a state criminal background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be
sent to the board for the screening of applicants;
(c) The board is prohibited from releasing any criminal history record
information to any private entity or other licensing board, or authorizing
receipt of such information by any private entity or other licensing board;
and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the
Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be an amount no greater than the
actual cost of processing the request and conducting the background check.
The board may charge this fee to the applicant.
(3) Licensees shall display or have available an original current license at any place of
employment. It shall be unlawful for any person to display a license in an effort to
misrepresent his or her qualifications. An individual who no longer meets the
licensure requirements shall not display a license nor purport to have the
qualifications.
(4)[(3)] Licensees shall meet continuing education requirements.
(5)[(4)] Licenses shall be renewed or reinstated in accordance with the requirements
set out by the board.
(6)[(5)] Licenses may be placed on inactive status for those who are not actively
employed[, as defined by this chapter]. To reactivate an inactive license, the
applicant shall submit a new application and required fee and meet all requirements
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
for reactivation.
(7)[(6)] The requirements of this section shall be established by the board through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
Section 7. KRS 311B.120 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A, set appropriate fees and penalties for:
(1) The application process;
(2) Verification of qualifications;
(3) Issuance and renewal of licenses for advanced imaging professionals, medical
imaging technologists, radiographers, radiation therapists, nuclear medicine
technologists, magnetic resonance imaging technologists, diagnostic medical
sonographers, and limited X-ray machine operators;
(4) [Duplicate licenses;
(5) Home study courses for limited X-ray machine operators;
(6) ]Late renewals or reinstatements;
(5)[(7)] Violations;
(6)[(8)] Payments[Checks] issued on accounts with insufficient funds; and
(7)[(9)] Any other actions as deemed appropriate by the board.
Section 8. KRS 311B.150 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to:
(1) Claim to be a licensee or perform medical imaging or therapeutic procedures unless
licensed under this chapter or otherwise exempt from the requirements of this
chapter;
(2) Manipulate equipment that produces ionizing or nonionizing radiation or
administer radiopharmaceuticals unless licensed under this chapter or otherwise
exempt from the requirements of this chapter;
(3) [Knowingly ]Employ an advanced imaging professional, medical imaging
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
technologist, radiographer, radiation therapist, nuclear medicine technologist,
magnetic resonance imaging technologist, diagnostic medical sonographer, or
limited X-ray machine operator unless that individual is licensed under[ the
provisions of] this chapter or otherwise exempt from the requirements of this
chapter; or
(4) Be an advanced imaging professional, medical imaging technologist, radiographer,
radiation therapist, nuclear medicine technologist, magnetic resonance imaging
technologist, diagnostic medical sonographer, limited X-ray machine operator,
employer of one (1) of these individuals, or any other person who, having
knowledge of a situation listed in paragraphs (a) to (k)[(j)] of this subsection,
refrains from reporting to the board a licensee who:
(a) Has been convicted of any felony or a misdemeanor involving drugs, alcohol,
fraud, deceit, falsification of records, a breach of trust, physical harm or
endangerment to others, or dishonesty under the laws of any state or of the
United States;
(b) Is suspected of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license
or credential to practice in his or her discipline;
(c) Is suspected of negligently or willfully acting in a manner inconsistent with
professional practice relative to his or her discipline;
(d) Is suspected of being unfit or incompetent to practice by reason of negligence
or other causes, including but not limited to being unable to practice with
reasonable skill or safety;
(e) Has a license or credential to practice medical imaging or radiation therapy
denied, suspended, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in another jurisdiction
on grounds sufficient to cause a license or credential to be denied, suspended,
revoked, or otherwise disciplined in this Commonwealth;
(f) Is practicing medical imaging or radiation therapy, as it pertains to this
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
chapter, without a current valid[active] license or valid temporary license
issued by the board;
(g) Is suspected of aiding or abetting unlicensed practice under this chapter;
(h) Is suspected of misusing or misappropriating any drugs placed in the
licensee's custody to be administered to or used by others;
(i)[(h)] Is suspected of falsely or negligently making incorrect entries or failing
to make essential entries on essential records;
(j)[(i)] Is suspected of abusing controlled substances, prescription medications,
illegal substances, or alcohol; or
(k)[(j)] Is suspected of violating any provision of this chapter.
Section 9. KRS 311B.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who fails to comply with any provision of this chapter, any
administrative regulation promulgated under this chapter, or any valid order of
the board shall be fined a reasonable amount as determined by the board through
the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A. Each day of violation or noncompliance shall constitute a separate offense.
(2) The board shall assess a civil penalty against an individual or licensee who
performs diagnostic or therapeutic procedures without a valid license or aids or
abets unlicensed or unlawful practice.
(3) Prior to assessing a civil penalty, the board shall confirm a violation by any of the
following:
(a) Observing the violation;
(b) Obtaining records, documents, or other physical evidence;
(c) Obtaining statements that confirm the existence of the violation from either
the employer or the employee; or
(d) Obtaining statements that corroborate the allegation that a violation has
occurred from a third party, such as a patient or coworker.
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
(4) A civil penalty shall be assessed against an individual who performs diagnostic or
therapeutic procedures without a valid license as follows:
(a) Failure to apply for an initial license by an individual who is fully qualified
for licensure at the time of the violation shall be assessed a civil penalty plus
the license application fee;
(b) Failure to apply for renewal by an individual who would be eligible for
renewal of a license but would not currently qualify due to insufficient
continuing education at the time of the violation shall be assessed a civil
penalty plus the license renewal fee;
(c) Performance of a diagnostic or therapeutic procedure requiring licensure
by an individual who is not qualified for a license at the time of the violation
shall be assessed a civil penalty; and
(d) Civil penalties for repeating the offenses specified in paragraphs (a) to (c) of
this subsection shall be doubled. Each day of violation shall constitute a
separate repeat offense.
(5) A civil penalty, double the amount assessed against an individual under
subsection (4) of this section, shall also be assessed against the employer of the
individual.
(6) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for no more than six (6) months, or by
a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.
(7) When any person other than a professional holding a valid license under this
chapter has engaged in any act or practice that violates any provision of this
chapter, the Franklin Circuit Court, on application of the board, may issue an
injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct.
(8) The board may deny, revoke, or suspend the license of an individual who:
(a)[(1)] Has engaged in conduct relating to his or her profession that is likely to
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
deceive, defraud, or harm the public, which shall include violation of KRS
304.39-215 and conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-
060(4) or (5);
(b)[(2)] Has a substance use disorder that impairs the individual's ability to
perform his or her duties;
(c)[(3)] Develops a physical or mental disability or other condition that makes
continued practice or performance of his or her duties potentially dangerous to
patients or the public;
(d)[(4)] Performs procedures under or represents as valid to any person a
license:
1.[(a)] That is invalid or not issued by the board;
2.[(b)] Containing unauthorized alterations; or
3.[(c)] Containing changes that are inconsistent with board records
regarding its issuance;
(e)[(5)] Has been convicted of a crime that is a felony under the laws of this
state or convicted of a felony in a federal court, unless the individual has had
all civil rights restored, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(f)[(6)] Exhibits significant or repeated failure in the performance of
professional duties; or
(g)[(7)] Fails to comply with any administrative regulation of the board.
Section 10. KRS 311.727 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Auscultate[Ascultate]" means to examine by listening for sounds made by
internal organs of the fetus, specifically for a fetal heartbeat, utilizing an
ultrasound transducer or a fetal heart rate monitor;
(b) "Obstetric ultrasound" or "ultrasound" means the use of ultrasonic waves for
diagnostic[ or therapeutic] purposes, specifically to monitor a developing
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
fetus; and
(c) "Qualified technician" means a medical imaging technologist licensed under
KRS Chapter 311B,[as defined in KRS 311B.020 who is certified in
obstetrics and gynecology by the American Registry for Diagnostic Medical
Sonography] or a nurse midwife or advance practice nurse practitioner in
obstetrics with certification in obstetrical ultrasonography.
(2) Prior to a woman giving informed consent to having any part of an abortion
performed, the physician who is to perform the abortion or a qualified technician to
whom the responsibility has been delegated by the physician shall:
(a) Perform an obstetric ultrasound on the pregnant woman;
(b) Provide a simultaneous explanation of what the ultrasound is depicting, which
shall include the presence and location of the unborn child within the uterus
and the number of unborn children depicted and also, if the ultrasound image
indicates that fetal demise has occurred, inform the woman of that fact;
(c) Display the ultrasound images so that the pregnant woman may view the
images;
(d) Auscultate[Ascultate] the fetal heartbeat of the unborn child so that the
pregnant woman may hear the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible;
(e) Provide a medical description of the ultrasound images, which shall include
the dimensions of the embryo or fetus and the presence of external members
and internal organs, if present and viewable; and
(f) Retain in the woman's medical record a signed certification from the pregnant
woman that she has been presented with the information required to be
provided under paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection and has viewed the
ultrasound images, listened to the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible, or
declined to do so. The signed certification shall be on a form prescribed by the
cabinet.
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1178
(3) When the ultrasound images and heartbeat sounds are provided to and reviewed
with the pregnant woman,[ nothing in] this section shall not be construed to prevent
the pregnant woman from averting her eyes from the ultrasound images or
requesting the volume of the heartbeat be reduced or turned off if the heartbeat is
audible.[ Neither] The physician, the qualified technician, and[nor] the pregnant
woman shall not be subject to any penalty if the pregnant woman refuses to look at
the displayed ultrasound images or to listen to the heartbeat if the heartbeat is
audible.
(4) The requirements of this section shall be in addition to any requirement contained
in KRS 311.725 or any other section of KRS 311.710 to 311.820.
(5) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply in the case of a medical emergency
or medical necessity. If a medical emergency or medical necessity compels the
performance or inducement of an abortion, the physician who will perform or
induce the abortion, prior to its performance or inducement if possible, shall inform
the pregnant woman of the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment
that an immediate abortion is necessary. Any physician who performs or induces an
abortion without the prior satisfaction of the requirements of this section because of
a medical emergency or medical necessity shall enter the reasons for the conclusion
that a medical emergency or medical necessity exists in the medical record of the
pregnant woman.
Section 11. The following KRS sections are repealed:
311B.080 Board to recognize and enforce national standards.
311B.180 Civil penalties.
311B.190 Penalties to be determined by board.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 12/16/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed